District of Columbia statutes.
2-303.02

Repealed

Methods of source selection and record-keeping.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 302, 32 DCR 7396
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 402(b), 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 119(b), 47 DCR 520
Sept. 16, 2000, D.C. Law 13-155, § 2(b), 47 DCR 5035
June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-122, § 2(d), 53 DCR 2834
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-64, § 2(b), 56 DCR 6603
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1183.2.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 202(b) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and § 202(b) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 202(b) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Procurement Practices Human Care Agreement Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-348, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 5009).